Alaska statutes. Title 22. Judiciary.
Chapter 35. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 22.35.010.
Geographic cost-of-living adjustment. [Repealed, § 19 ch 47 SLA 2013.]

Sec. 22.35.020.
Copies of records for child support purposes.

If a copy of a court record is requested by the child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

or a child support agency of another state, the official custodian of the record shall provide the requesting agency with a copy of the record, including any social security number that the record might contain. If the requested record is maintained by the court system in an electronic data base, the record may be supplied by providing the requesting agency with a copy of the electronic record and a statement certifying its contents. A requesting agency receiving otherwise confidential information under this section may use it only for child support purposes authorized by law.

History.

(§ 11 ch 132 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency created in AS

25.27.010

” was changed to “child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

” in this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Sec. 22.35.030.
Records concerning criminal cases resulting in acquittal or dismissal.

The Alaska Court System may not publish a court record of a criminal case on a publicly available website if 60 days have elapsed from the date of acquittal or dismissal and

the defendant was acquitted of all charges filed in the case;

all criminal charges against the defendant in the case have been dismissed and were not dismissed as part of a plea agreement in another criminal case under Rule 11, Alaska Rules of Criminal Procedure;

the defendant was acquitted of some of the criminal charges in the case and the remaining charges were dismissed; or

all criminal charges against the defendant in the case have been dismissed after a suspended entry of judgment under AS

12.55.078

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 1 SLA 2016; am § 100 ch 36 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For a statement of legislative intent regarding this section, see sec. 1, ch. 1, SLA 2016 in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective dates. —

Section 4, ch. 1, SLA 2016 makes this section effective October 1, 2016.

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 3, ch. 1, SLA 2016, paragraphs (1) -- (3) of this section apply "to criminal charges concluded on or after the effective date of this Act by dismissal or by acquittal of the defendant."